src-fst-morphology-affixes-numerals.lexc.md
# Numeral inflection
Numeral inflection is like nominal, except that numerals compound in all
forms which requires great amount of care in the inflection patterns.

* **LEXICON ARABICCASES**  adds +Arab

* **LEXICON ARABICCASE**  adds +Arab

* **LEXICON ARABICCASE0**  adds +Arab

* **LEXICON DIGITCASES**  to distinguish between 0 and oblique

* **LEXICON DIGITCASE0**

* **LEXICON DIGITCASE**

* **LEXICON ROMNUMTAGOBL**

# Original file

* Numeral nominative back examples:*
* *kaksi:* `kaksi+Num+Card+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # two)

* Numeral nominative front examples:*
* *yksi:* `yksi+Num+Card+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # one)

* Numeral nominative plural back examples:*
* *kahdet:* `kaksi+Num+Card+Pl+Nom`

* Numeral nominative plural front examples:*
* *yhdet:* `yksi+Num+Card+Pl+Nom`

* Numeral weak singular back examples:*
* *kahden:* `kaksi+Num+Card+Sg+Gen`
* *kahdella:* `kaksi+Num+Card+Sg+Ade`
* *kahdelta:* `kaksi+Num+Card+Sg+Abl`
* *kahdelle:* `kaksi+Num+Card+Sg+All`
* *kahdessa:* `kaksi+Num+Card+Sg+Ine`
* *kahdesta:* `kaksi+Num+Card+Sg+Ela`
* *kahdeksi:* `kaksi+Num+Card+Sg+Tra`
* *kahdetta:* `kaksi+Num+Card+Sg+Abe`

* Numeral weak singular front examples:*
* *yhden:* `yksi+Num+Card+Sg+Gen`
* *yhdellä:* `yksi+Num+Card+Sg+Ade`
* *yhdeltä:* `yksi+Num+Card+Sg+Abl`
* *yhdelle:* `yksi+Num+Card+Sg+All`
* *yhdessä:* `yksi+Num+Card+Sg+Ine`
* *yhdestä:* `yksi+Num+Card+Sg+Ela`
* *yhdeksi:* `yksi+Num+Card+Sg+Tra`
* *yhdettä:* `yksi+Num+Card+Sg+Abe`

* Numeral strong singular back examples:*
* *kahtena:* `kaksi+Num+Card+Sg+Ess`

* Numeral strong singular front examples:*
* *yhtenä:* `yksi+Num+Card+Sg+Ess`

* Numeral weak plural back examples:*
* *kaksilla:* `kaksi+Num+Card+Pl+Ade`
* *kaksilta:* `kaksi+Num+Card+Pl+Abl`
* *kaksille:* `kaksi+Num+Card+Pl+All`
* *kaksissa:* `kaksi+Num+Card+Pl+Ine`
* *kaksista:* `kaksi+Num+Card+Pl+Ela`
* *kaksiksi:* `kaksi+Num+Card+Pl+Tra`
* *kaksitta:* `kaksi+Num+Card+Pl+Abe`

* Numeral weak plural front examples:*
* *yksillä:* `yksi+Num+Card+Pl+Ade`
* *yksiltä:* `yksi+Num+Card+Pl+Abl`
* *yksille:* `yksi+Num+Card+Pl+All`
* *yksissä:* `yksi+Num+Card+Pl+Ine`
* *yksistä:* `yksi+Num+Card+Pl+Ela`
* *yksiksi:* `yksi+Num+Card+Pl+Tra`
* *yksittä:* `yksi+Num+Card+Pl+Abe`

* Numeral weak plural back strong examples:*
* *kaksina:* `kaksi+Num+Card+Pl+Ess`
* *kaksine:* `kaksi+Num+Card+Com`

* Numeral weak plural front strong examples:*
* *yksinä:* `yksi+Num+Card+Pl+Ess`
* *yksine:* `yksi+Num+Card+Com`

* Numeral singular partitive a examples:*
* *kahdeksaa:* `kahdeksan+Num+Card+Sg+Par` (Eng. # eight)

* Numeral singular partitive ä examples:*
* *neljää:* `neljä+Num+Card+Sg+Par` (Eng. # four)

* Numeral singular partitive a poss aan examples:*
* *kolmea:* `kolme+Num+Card+Sg+Par` (Eng. # three)

* Numeral singular partitive ta examples:*
* *kuutta:* `kuusi+Num+Card+Sg+Par` (Eng. # six)

* Numeral singular partitive tä examples:*
* *viittä:* `viisi+Num+Card+Sg+Par` (Eng. # five)

* Numeral singular illative an examples:*
* *kahdeksaan:* `kahdeksan+Num+Card+Sg+Ill`

* Numeral singular illative en back examples:*
* *kolmeen:* `kolme+Num+Card+Sg+Ill`

* Numeral singular illative en front examples:*
* *viiteen:* `viisi+Num+Card+Sg+Ill`

* Numeral singular illative in back examples:*
* *miljardiin:* `miljardi+Num+Card+Sg+Ill` (Eng. # billion)

* Numeral singular illative än examples:*
* *neljään:* `neljä+Num+Card+Sg+Ill`

* Numeral plural partitive ia examples:*
* *kaksia:* `kaksi+Num+Card+Pl+Par`

* Numeral plural partitive iä examples:*
* *neljiä:* `neljä+Num+Card+Pl+Par`

* Numeral plural partitive ja examples:*
* *miljardeja:* `miljardi+Num+Card+Pl+Par`

* Numeral plural genitive ien back examples:*
* *kaksien:* `kaksi+Num+Card+Pl+Gen` (Eng. NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT)

* Numeral plural genitive ien front examples:*
* *yksien:* `yksi+Num+Card+Pl+Gen` (Eng. NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT)

* Numeral plural genitive jen back examples:*
* *satojen:* `sata+Num+Card+Pl+Gen` (Eng. # hundred NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT)

* Numeral plural genitive ten back examples:*
* *kuutten:* `kuusi+Num+Card+Pl+Gen` (Eng. NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT)

* Numeral plural genitive ten front examples:*
* *viitten:* `viisi+Num+Card+Pl+Gen` (Eng. NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT)

* Numeral plural genitive in back examples:*
* *yhdeksäin:* `yhdeksän+Num+Card+Pl+Gen+Use/Rare` (Eng. NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT)

* Numeral plural genitive in front examples:*
* *neljäin:* `neljä+Num+Card+Pl+Gen+Use/Rare` (Eng. NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT)

* Numeral plural illaive ihin bavk examples:*
* *miljardeihin:* `miljardi+Num+Card+Pl+Ill`

* Numeral plural illaive iin back examples:*
* *kaksiin:* `kaksi+Num+Card+Pl+Ill`

* Numeral plural illaive iin front examples:*
* *yksiin:* `yksi+Num+Card+Pl+Ill`

* Numeral possessive back examples:*
* *kahteni:* `kaksi+Num+Card+Sg+Nom+PxSg1`

* Numeral possessive front examples:*
* *yhteni:* `yksi+Num+Card+Sg+Nom+PxSg1`

* Numeral possessive back aan examples:*
* *kolmeaan:* `kolme+Num+Card+Sg+Par+PxSg3`

* Numeral possessive back eenback examples:*
* *kahdekseen:* `kaksi+Num+Card+Sg+Tra+PxSg3`

* Numeral possessive back een front examples:*
* *neljäkseen:* `neljä+Num+Card+Sg+Tra+PxSg3`

* Numeral possessive back ään examples:*
* *viittään:* `viisi+Num+Card+Sg+Par+PxSg3`

* Numeral clitic back examples:*
* *kaksihan:* `kaksi+Num+Card+Sg+Nom+Foc/han`

* Numeral clitic front examples:*
* *yksihän:* `yksi+Num+Card+Sg+Nom+Foc/han`

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/numerals.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-fin/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/numerals.lexc)</small>

---
